Louisiana, session 2026, HB423.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:39.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§39.3. Parade safety standards
A. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall promulgate rules
and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to ensure all
of the following public safety measures are met at all permitted parades:
(1) To prohibit glass bottles on parade floats.
(2) To prohibit discriminatory items and items that convey discriminatory
messages.
(3) To prohibit throwing items with obscene words or symbols.
(4) To establish float rider safety briefings, which shall be provided to each
person riding on a parade float.
(5) To provide for incident reporting procedures when any of the rules
established pursuant to this Section are violated.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-993 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 423
B. Each organization hosting or conducting a parade shall maintain a list of
names of every person riding on a parade float or otherwise participating in a parade
procession for the purposes of identification following an incident report made
pursuant to this Section.